Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.160

Washington court reports commission.

There is hereby created a commission advisory to the supreme court regarding the publication of the decisions of the supreme court and court of appeals of this state in both the form of advance sheets for temporary use and in permanent form, to be known as the Washington court reports commission, and to include the reporter of decisions, the state law librarian, and such other members, including a judge of the court of appeals and a member in good standing of the Washington state bar association, as determined by the chief justice of the supreme court, who shall be chair of the commission. Members of the commission shall serve as such without additional or any compensation: PROVIDED, That members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240.

[ 2011 c 336 s 50; 2005 c 190 s 1; 1995 c 257 s 1; 1984 c 287 s 7; 1971 c 42 s 1; 1943 c 185 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 11071-1. Prior: 1917 c 87 s 1; 1905 c 167 ss 1-4; 1895 c 55 s 1; 1891 c 37 s 1; 1890 p 327 s 1.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.